Massachusetts, session 194th, H2817.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 3 of Chapter 32 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2012 Official edition is
hereby amended by inserting after the word "managers;" in line 291 the following:- "employees
of University of Massachusetts Lowell working as Director of Radiation Safety, Radiation Safety
Specialist, Accelerator Supervisor, Radiation Services Manager, Nuclear Reactor Supervisor,
Chief Reactor Operator, Nuclear React Operator-professional and Reactor Engineer;"
of 1